New York, session 2025-2026, S390.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 2 380.50 of the criminal procedure law, as separately amended by chapters 3 173 and 198 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 4 (2) if such victim is unable or unwilling to express [himself or 5 herself] themself before the court or a person so mentally or physically 6 disabled as to make it impracticable to appear in court in person or the 7 victim is deceased, a member of the family of such victim, except that 8 where such victim is deceased and survived by both a spouse and a parent 9 or parents, the court in its sole discretion may allow a spouse or 10 parent or, upon consultation with counsel for the defendant and the 11 people, allow both to make a statement on behalf of such victim, or the 12 legal guardian or representative of the legal guardian of the victim 13 where such guardian or representative has personal knowledge of and a 14 relationship with the victim, unless the court finds that it would be 15 inappropriate for such person or persons to make a statement on behalf 16 of the victim. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01570-01-5